Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-651
Railroad sign or signal, defined.

Railroad sign or signal shall mean any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 147.